District of Columbia statutes.
34-1921.08

Rights to build and lay conduits not compensable in event of condemnation.

If at any time the District of Columbia or the national government shall acquire, by purchase, condemnation proceedings, or otherwise, the property of any telegraph company in the District of Columbia, nothing shall then be paid for the rights accorded under §§ 34-1921.01 to 34-1921.07, inclusive, to build and lay such conduits.

History

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 986, ch. 1415, § 8

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1417.
1973 Ed., § 43-1417.